dictsource/gag_rules
// This file is UTF-8 encoded
// translation rules for Gagauz
// Author: Andy Vladescu, andyvladescu770@gmail.com, 2025

// Vowels (latin version)
.L01 ä e i ö ü  // front vowels
.L02 a ı o u ê  // back vowels


// Vowels (cyrillic version)
.L11 ӓ е и ӧ ӱ  // front vowels
.L12 а о у ы э  // back vowels


// Latin group letters

.group a
   a       A

.group ä
   ä       &

.group b
   b       b

.group c
   c       dZ;

.group ç
   ç       tS;
   ça (_   =tS;A

.group d
   d       d

.group e
 _) e      je  // at the beginning of words
    e      ;e

.group ê
   ê       @

.group f
   f       f

.group g
   g       g
   g (L01  J

.group h
 _) h      h  // at the beginning of words
    h      x

.group ı
   ı       I

.group i
   i       i

.group j
   j       Z

.group k
   k       k
   k (L01  c

.group l
   l       l
   l (L02  L
 L02) l (K L
   l (L01  l^

.group m
   m       m

.group n
   n       n
   n (L01  n^

.group o
   o       o

.group ö
   ö       W

.group p
   p       p

.group r
   r       r

.group s
   s       s
   s (L01  s;

.group ş
   ş       S

.group t
   t       t

.group ţ
   ţ       ts

.group u
   u       u

.group ü
   ü       y

.group v
   v       v
   v (L02  w

.group y
   y       j

.group z
   z       z
   z (L01  z;
    

// Cyrillic group letters

.group а
   а      a

.group ӓ
   ӓ       &

.group б
   б       b

.group в
   в       v
   в (L12  w

.group г
   г       g
   г (L11  J

.group д
   д       d

.group е
 _) е      je  // at the beginning of words
    е      ;e

.group ё
   ё       jo

.group ж
   ж       Z

.group ӂ
   ӂ       dZ;

.group з
   з       z
   з (L11  z;

.group и
   и       i

.group й
   й       j

.group к
   к       k
   к (L01  c

.group л
   л       l
   л (L12  L
 L12) л (K L
   л (L11  l^

.group м
   м       m

.group н
   н       n
   н (L01  n^

.group о
   о       o

.group ӧ
   ӧ       W

.group п
   п       p

.group р
   р       r

.group с
   с       s
   с (L11  s;

.group т
   т       t

.group у
   у       u

.group ӱ
   ӱ       y

.group ф
   ф       f

.group х
 _) х      h  // at the beginning of words
    х      x

.group ц
   ц       ts

.group ч
   ч       tS;
   ча (_   =tS;A

.group ш
   ш       S

.group щ
   щ       S;tS;

.group ъ
   ъ       j

.group ы
   ы       I

.group ь
   ь       j

.group э
   э       @

.group ю
   ю       ju

.group я
   я       jA
